Arkansas, session 2025, SB26.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Commerce - Division of Aeronautics for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U021U ACOM AERONAUTICS DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS12
(2) B023C ENGINEER, P.E. 1 GRADE GS11
(3) B025C ACOM AERONAUTICS ASSISTANT DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS08
(4) A116C BUSINESS OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(5) C114C ACOM EXECUTIVE ASST TO SECRETARY 1 GRADE GS07
(6) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
*MAH001*
01/06/2025 3:25:08 PM MAH001

SB26
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 6

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the Division of Aeronautics
Fund, for personal services, operating expenses, and grants to cities, and
counties and other eligible applicants, by the Department of Commerce -
Division of Aeronautics for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $398,931
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 140,910
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 165,029
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 50,000
(C) PROF. FEES 763,500
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) AIRPORT GRANT FUNDING AND RELATED
EXPENSES 15,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $16,518,370

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL GRANTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the federal
funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for airport
grant funding and related expenses by the Department of Commerce - Division
of Aeronautics for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) AIRPORT GRANT FUNDING AND RELATED
EXPENSES $12,000,000

SECTION 4. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
01/06/2025 3:25:08 PM MAH001

SB26
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 5. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 6. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.








01/06/2025 3:25:08 PM MAH001